Tennessee, session 114, HB2565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-5-103(b)(2), is amended by
inserting the language ", in writing," immediately after the language "notify".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2565
012261
- 1 -